Arkansas, session 2025, SB501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. TITLE.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Tenant Possessions
Recovery Act".

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 18-16-108 is repealed.
18-16-108. Property left on premises after termination of lease.
(a) Upon the voluntary or involuntary termination of any lease
agreement, all property left in and about the premises by the lessee shall be
considered abandoned and may be disposed of by the lessor as the lessor shall
see fit without recourse by the lessee.
(b) All property placed on the premises by the tenant or lessee is
subject to a lien in favor of the lessor for the payment of all sums agreed
to be paid by the lessee.
*JMB565*
03-20-2025 09:56:01 JMB565

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB501

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code Title 18, Chapter 6, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
18-16-114. Notice of repossession — Tenant possessions recovery.
(a) This section applies to a writ of possession issued under § 18-16-
507, the Arkansas Residential Landlord-Tenant Act of 2007, § 18-17-101 et
seq., § 18-60-208, § 18-60-310, or an equivalent provision of local
ordinance.
(b)(1) After a court has issued a writ of possession, the landlord
shall, at least fourteen (14) days before the scheduled date of repossession
as set by the sheriff of the county where the property is located, provide
written notice to the tenant of the date on which the writ of possession is
scheduled to be executed by:
(A) Sending the notice by first-class mail with
certificate of mailing; and
(B) Posting the written notice on the front door of the
leased premises and taking a timestamped photograph indicating the date and
time of the notice posted on the front door.
(2) The notice required under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
shall include:
(A) The court summary ejectment case number;
(B) The tenant's name as stated in the summary ejectment
case;
(C) The address of the leased premises;
(D) The date that the writ of possession was ordered by
the court;
(E) The scheduled date of eviction;
(F) A statement that the repossession may occur unless the
tenant:
(i) Returns possession of the leased premises to the
landlord; or
(ii) Exercises the right of redemption;
(G) A statement that if the eviction occurs, all personal
property remaining in or about the leased premises shall be considered
abandoned and may be disposed of ten (10) days after the eviction date;
(H) A statement informing the tenant as to how the tenant
03-20-2025 09:56:01 JMB565

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB501
may obtain any personal property left in or about the leased premises after
the eviction occurs;
(I) A statement that the notice is the final notice to the
tenant of the intended repossession, even if the repossession is stayed for
any reason; and
(J) The telephone number, email address, and mailing
address at which the landlord may be contacted.
(c) A landlord may charge the tenant for expenses actually incurred in
providing notice under subsection (b) of this section in an amount not to
exceed five dollars ($5.00).
(d) It is a rebuttable presumption that a tenant was properly notified
as required under subsection (b) of this section if the landlord provides to
the sheriff:
(1) The certificate of mailing of the notice in subdivision
(b)(1)(A) of this section;
(2) A photograph of the notice posted on the front door of the
leased premises containing a readable timestamp indicating the date and time
that the notice was posted; and
(3) A signed affidavit of the person who posted the notice on
the front door of the leased premises.
(e)(1) If the sheriff reasonably believes that the landlord has not
provided the notice required under subsection (b) of this section or that the
tenant may have redeemed the property, the sheriff:
(A) Shall notify the court; and
(B) Shall not execute the writ of possession without
further order of the court.
(2) If the court finds that the landlord did not provide the
notice required under subsection (b) of this section, the court shall vacate
the writ of possession.
(f) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, if the
landlord presents the documentation listed in subsection (b) of this section,
the sheriff:
(1) Shall file the documentation with the clerk of the court;
and
(2) May execute the writ of possession by putting the landlord
in possession of the premises, without the removal of any personal property
03-20-2025 09:56:01 JMB565

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB501
from the premises.
(g) If a tenant is not present during the execution of the writ of
possession, the sheriff shall post a notice on the front door of the premises
stating that repossession of the premises has been completed and that the
tenant has ten (10) days to reclaim the tenant's personal property.
(h)(1) A tenant shall have ten (10) days following the execution of
the writ of possession to recover personal property from the premises.
(2) During the ten-day period, the landlord:
(A) Shall make the tenant's personal property reasonably
available for purposes of reclamation; and
(B) Is not liable to the tenant for any losses relating to
the personal property unless the loss is the result of a deliberate or
grossly negligent act on the part of the landlord.
(3) A tenant may not waive the right to reclaim personal
property under this section.
(h)(1) Unless the landlord and the tenant agree otherwise, personal
property remaining in or about the leased premises following the ten-day
period established under this section shall be considered abandoned and may
be disposed of under subdivision (h)(3) of this section.
(2) The landlord or any person acting on the landlord's behalf
shall not be liable for any loss of or damage to property deemed abandoned.
(3)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (h)(5) of this section,
a landlord may dispose of abandoned personal property by:
(i) Transportation to a licensed landfill or solid
waste facility;
(ii) Donation to charity;
(iii) Sale; or
(iv) Any other legal means.
(B) If a landlord disposes of abandoned personal property
by sale, the tenant shall be entitled to any proceeds of the sale that exceed
any back rent, move-out costs, or damage fees owed by the tenant to the
landlord.
(4) Personal property deemed abandoned under this section shall
not be placed in a public right-of-way or on any public property.
(5) On the execution of a writ of possession, a landlord is not
prohibited from:
03-20-2025 09:56:01 JMB565

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB501
(A) Disposing of abandoned personal property consisting of
perishable food, hazardous materials, or trash; or
(B) Transferring an animal to an animal control officer, a
humane society, or any other person willing to provide care for the animal.
(i) If a court finds in favor of a tenant based on a violation of this
section, the tenant is entitled to:
(1) Actual damages;
(2) Reasonable attorney's fees and costs;
(3) Injunctive relief to recover possession of the leased
premises or personal property; or
(4) Any other remedy the court may find reasonable.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 18-16-507, concerning the writ of
possession for ejectment from a real property, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(h) A writ of possession under this section shall be executed in
compliance with § 18-16-114.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 18-60-208 is amended to read as follows:
18-60-208. Writ of possession.
(a)(1) When the judgment for the plaintiff is both for the recovery of
the possession of the premises and for the damages, the plaintiff may have a
writ of possession.
(2) The writ shall command the officer to whom it may be
directed to deliver to the plaintiff possession of the premises and also
command him or her to levy and collect the damages and costs, as in
executions on judgments in personal actions.
(b) A writ of possession under this section shall be executed in
compliance with § 18-16-114.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 18-60-310(c), concerning the execution of a
writ of possession, is amended to add an additional subdivision to read as
follows:
(4)(A) If the determination is in favor of the plaintiff and the
property is a manufactured home or mobile home owned by the defendant, the
property is not required to be stored by the plaintiff following service of
03-20-2025 09:56:01 JMB565

As Engrossed: S3/20/25 SB501
the writ of possession, and shall be removed at the defendant’s own expense.
(B) Upon a motion by plaintiff, the court shall find that
a manufactured home or mobile home remaining on a lot leased by the plaintiff
thirty (30) days after service of the writ of possession is deemed abandoned.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 18-60-310, concerning the execution of writ
of possession relating to a forcible entry and detainer and an unlawful
detainer, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) A writ of possession under this section shall be executed in
compliance with § 18-16-114.

/s/J. Scott
























03-20-2025 09:56:01 JMB565